Wyoming, session 2026, HB0131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0131

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0415
Section 1. W.S. 9-13-201 and 9-13-202 are created to
read:

ARTICLE 2
LIMITATION ON EXPENDITURE OF STATE FUNDS

9-13-201. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Government entity" means the state and all
its branches, agencies, departments, commissions,
institutions, instrumentalities and all political
subdivisions including any county, city, town, school
district, special district, joint powers board, community
college and the University of Wyoming;

(ii) "Government member association" means any
association or organization which is composed primarily of
government entities or their officers or employees and
whose purposes include influencing legislative or
administrative action. "Government member association" does
not include entities created through interstate compact or
HB0131

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0415
joint powers boards formed for the primary purpose of
performing a specific governmental function or service.

9-13-202. Membership in associations and
organizations of other government entities.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
public funds shall be expended by any government entity for
any of the following:

(i) The payment of membership fees or dues to
any government member association;

(ii) Reimbursement for the expenses of room,
board or travel that are related to the government entity's
participation in the activities of a government member
association;

(iii) Payment by or on behalf of a government
entity to any government member association for the
purposes of lobbying activities pursuant to W.S. 28-7-101;

HB0131

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0415
(iv) Contributions to political campaigns or
candidates.

(b) If an officer, employee, contractor or any agent
of a government entity participates in the business or
activities of a government member association while acting
in their official capacity or while using public funds or
resources, the government entity shall document the
participation. The documentation shall include the amount
of time spent and the nature of the work performed while
participating in the government member association. The
documentation shall be published not less than once a month
on the government entity's website.

Section 2. W.S. 16-4-201(a)(v) and by creating a new
paragraph (xv), 18-3-522 and 21-3-111(a)(x) are amended to
read:

16-4-201. Definitions; short title; designation of
ombudsman.

(a) As used in this act:

HB0131

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0415
(v) "Public records" when not otherwise
specified includes any information in a physical form
created, accepted, or obtained by a governmental entity in
furtherance of its official function and transaction of
public business which is not privileged or confidential by
law. Without limiting the foregoing, the term "public
records" includes any written communication or other
information, whether in paper, electronic, or other
physical form, received by a governmental entity in
furtherance of the transaction of public business of the
governmental entity, whether at a meeting or outside a
meeting. Electronic communications solely between students
attending a school in Wyoming and electronic communications
solely between students attending a school in Wyoming and a
sender or recipient using a nonschool user address are not
a public record of that school. Records created by a
governmental entity related to the governmental entity's
activity with a government member association shall be
public records. As used in this paragraph, a "school in
Wyoming" means the University of Wyoming, any community
college and any public school within a school district in
the state;

HB0131

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0415
(xv) "Government member association" means any
association or organization which is composed primarily of
government entities or their officers or employees and
whose purposes include influencing legislative or
administrative action. "Government member association" does
not include entities created through interstate compact or
joint powers boards formed for the primary purpose of
performing a specific governmental function or service.

18-3-522. Membership in organizations for furtherance
of good government.

Each board of county commissioners may take out a county
membership and cooperate with associations and
organizations of other counties or county officials within
or without this state for the furtherance of good
government and the protection of county interests. The cost
of Any membership may be paid with county funds in or
cooperation with such associations is subject to W.S.
9-13-202.

21-3-111. Powers of boards of trustees.

HB0131

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0415
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
within the state may:

(x) Become members of county, state, and
national school board associations and pay dues to such
associations,. A board of trustees may at its discretion
pay necessary travel expenses and per diem of members and
personnel attending meetings of such associations at a rate
not to exceed that paid state employees provided that any
such membership or payment is subject to W.S. 9-13-202;

Section 3. W.S. 33-29-305(a)(ix) is repealed.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0131